District of Columbia statutes.
4-754.23

Additional standards for providers of low barrier shelter.

In addition to the requirements in §§ 4-754.21 and 4-754.22, providers of low barrier shelter shall provide:

(1)

Case management services with an appropriately trained, qualified, and supervised case manager, which shall include the development of a service plan;

(2)

Hot shower facilities; and

(3)

Personal hygiene supplies.

Oct. 22, 2005, D.C. Law 16-35, § 14, 52 DCR 8113
This section is referenced in § 4-754.24 and § 4-754.25.